Illinois, session 104th, HB1532.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (115 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1701)7    Sec. 1. Policy. It is the the public policy of this State 8and the purpose of this Act to promote orderly and 9constructive relationships between all educational employees 10and their employers. Unresolved disputes between the 11educational employees and their employers are injurious to the 12public, and the General Assembly is therefore aware that 13adequate means must be established for minimizing them and 14providing for their resolution. It is the purpose of this Act 15to regulate labor relations between educational employers and 16educational employees, including the designation of 17educational employee representatives, negotiation of wages, 18hours and other conditions of employment and resolution of 19disputes arising under collective bargaining agreements. The 20General Assembly recognizes that substantial differences exist 21between educational employees and other public employees as a 22result of the uniqueness of the educational work calendar and 23educational work duties and the traditional and historical   HB1532- 2 -LRB104 08707 LNS 18761 b1patterns of collective bargaining between educational 2employers and educational employees and that such differences 3demand statutory regulation of collective bargaining between 4educational employers and educational employees in a manner 5that recognizes these differences. Recognizing that harmonious 6relationships are required between educational employees and 7their employers, the General Assembly has determined that the 8overall policy may best be accomplished by (a) granting to 9educational employees the right to organize and choose freely 10their representatives; (b) requiring educational employers to 11negotiate and bargain with employee organizations representing 12educational employees and to enter into written agreements 13evidencing the result of such bargaining; and (c) establishing 14procedures to provide for the protection of the rights of the 15educational employee, the educational employer and the public.16(Source: P.A. 83-1014.)